Tennessee, session 114, HB1140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-9-115(h)(2), is amended by
deleting "Class A misdemeanor, punishable only by fine" and substituting "Class E felony".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1140
001419
- 1 -